Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6786YH (3) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2452 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256.20 Data security program ââ 1 appropriation. 2 1. The department shall develop and administer a data 3 security program to allow school districts the option 4 to participate in a data security service to enhance the 5 protection of students and district data. 6 2. The department shall select one or more data security 7 programs and associated vendors through a request for approvals 8 process. 9 3. A school district may elect to participate in the data 10 security program on a school year basis. A school district 11 that elects to participate in the program for a school year 12 shall not withdraw from the program during that school year. 13 4. The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 14 to administer this section, including eligibility requirements 15 and program administration. 16 5. A data security program fund is established in the state 17 treasury. The fund shall be administered by the department and 18 shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly 19 and other moneys received by the department for deposit in 20 the fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated to the 21 department for the data security program. Notwithstanding 22 section 8.33, moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal 23 year shall not revert to the general fund of the state but 24 shall remain available for expenditure for the data security 25 program for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 26 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund 27 shall be credited to the fund. 28 Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION ââ DATA SECURITY PROGRAM. There 29 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 30 department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 31 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or 32 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 33 designated: 34 For deposit in the data security program fund created in 35 -1- LSB 6786YH (3) 91 mb/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 2452 section 256.20, as enacted in this Act: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 2